Utah statutes.
63B-4-301.   Bonds for golf course at Wasatch Mountain State Park.
(1)  The State Building Ownership Authority under authority of Title 63B,
Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or
execute obligations, or enter into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement
in which participation interests may be created, to provide up to $2,500,000
for a new nine-hole golf course at Wasatch Mountain State Park for the
Division of Parks and Recreation, together with additional amounts necessary
to:
(a)  pay costs of issuance;
(b)  pay capitalized interest; and
(c)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.
(2) (a)  The State Building Ownership Authority shall work cooperatively with
the Division of Parks and Recreation to seek out the most cost effective and
prudent lease purchase plan available.
(b)  The state treasurer, the director of the Division of Finance, and the
director of the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget shall provide
technical assistance to accomplish the purpose specified in Subsection (2)(a).
